California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 26) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 27.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4652.5.

(a) It shall be unlawful to intentionally or knowingly release any hog, boar, pig, or swine to live in a wild or feral state upon public or private land.

(b) It shall be unlawful to engage in, sponsor, or assist in the operation of a contained hunting preserve of wild pig, feral pig, European wild boar, or domestic swine within this state. For purposes of this subdivision, any tract of land on which a fence or other apparatus is used to prevent the free roaming of swine that are to be taken pursuant to Section 86 and not used solely for domestic swine production shall be deemed to be a contained hunting preserve.

(c) This section does not apply to an individual or entity that operated a contained hunting preserve on or before January 1, 2022, provided the individual or entity shall not operate more acres than the number of acres the individual or entity had in operation on or before January 1, 2022. 

(d) An individual or entity that operated a contained hunting preserve of wild pig, feral pig, European wild boar, or domestic swine on or before January 1, 2022, shall be prohibited from selling, transferring, or passing on the contained hunting preserve operation.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 28.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.

(a) The department may determine the design and type of information to be included on the wild pig validation and prescribe the procedures for the issuance and use of the validation.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 29) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 30.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4654.

(a) To obtain a wild pig validation, a person must be 12 years of age or older, and possess a valid hunting license, or if a nonresident, a valid California nonresident hunting license.

(b) A person authorized to obtain a wild pig validation may obtain a wild pig validation upon payment of a base fee, as follows:

(1) For a resident of the state, twenty-five dollars ($25).

(2) For a nonresident, ninety dollars ($90).

(c) The base fees specified in this section are applicable for the license year beginning July 1, 2024, and shall be adjusted under Section 713 for subsequent
 license years.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 32) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 97.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4655.

(a) Wild pig validations are valid only during that portion of the current hunting license year in which wild pigs may be taken or possessed in any area of the state.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 33) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 34.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4657.

(a) The holder of a wild pig validation shall keep the validation in their possession while hunting wild pig.

(b) (1) The commission shall adopt regulations governing the transportation of a wild pig carcass and the reporting of any take of a wild pig.

(2) The regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall provide for reporting of any take of a wild pig electronically, and shall require the following information:

(A) The identity of the person taking the wild pig.

(B) The date and location of the taking of the wild pig.

(C) Any other information the commission finds would be appropriate to better understand the location and abundance, and rate of take, of wild pigs or to enforce the provisions of this code or Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 35) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 36.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Fully Protected Mammals [4700. - 4700.]

4700.

(a) (1) Except as provided in this section or Section 2081.7, 2081.13, 2081.15, or 2835, a fully protected mammal may not be taken or possessed at any time. No provision of this code or any other law shall be construed to authorize the issuance of a permit or license to take a fully protected mammal, and no permit or license previously issued shall have any force or effect for that purpose. However, the department may authorize the taking of a fully protected mammal for necessary scientific research, including efforts to recover fully protected, threatened, or endangered species. Before authorizing the take of a fully protected mammal, the department shall make an effort to notify all affected and interested parties to
 solicit information and comments on the proposed authorization. The notification shall be published in the California Regulatory Notice Register and be made available to each person who has notified the department, in writing, of that person’s interest in fully protected species and who has provided an email address, if available, or postal address to the department. Affected and interested parties shall have 30 days after notification is published in the California Regulatory Notice Register to provide relevant information and comments on the proposed authorization.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “scientific research” does not include an action taken as part of specified mitigation for a project, as defined in Section 21065 of the Public Resources Code.

(3) A legally imported fully
 protected mammal may be possessed under a permit issued by the department.

(b) The following are fully protected mammals:

(1) Morro Bay kangaroo rat (Dipodomys heermanni morroensis).

(2) Bighorn sheep (Ovis canadensis), except Nelson bighorn sheep (subspecies Ovis canadensis nelsoni) as provided by subdivision (b) of Section 4902.

(3) Northern elephant seal (Mirounga angustirostris).

(4) Guadalupe fur seal (Arctocephalus townsendi).

(5) Ring-tailed cat (genus Bassariscus).

(6) Pacific right whale (Eubalaena sieboldi).

(7) Salt-marsh harvest mouse (Reithrodontomys raviventris).

(8) Southern sea otter (Enhydra lutris nereis).

(9) Wolverine (Gulo luscus).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 438, Sec. 3.   (AB 697)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Bear [4750. - 4763.]

4750.

It is unlawful to take any bear with firearm, trap, or bow and arrow without first procuring a tag authorizing the taking of that bear in accordance with this chapter, but no iron or steel-jawed or any type of metal-jawed trap shall be used to take any bear.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4751.

(a) Any resident of this state, 12 years of age or older, who possesses a valid hunting license, may procure the number of bear tags corresponding to the number of bear that may legally be taken by one person during the current license year, upon payment of a base fee of fifteen dollars ($15), as adjusted under Section 713, for each bear tag. Fee revenues collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section 3953 and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended as set forth in that section.

(b) Any nonresident of this state, 12 years of age or older, who possesses a valid California hunting license, may procure
 the number of bear tags corresponding to the number of bear that may be legally taken by one person during the current license year upon payment of the base fee of one hundred five dollars ($105), as adjusted under Section 713, for each bear tag. Fee revenues collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section 3953 and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended as set forth in that section. 

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 295, Sec. 9.   (AB 2151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4752.

Bear tags are valid only during that portion of the current hunting license year in which bear may be taken or possessed in any district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4753.

The person to whom a bear tag has been issued shall carry the tag while hunting bear. Upon the killing of any bear, that person shall immediately fill out the tag completely, legibly, and permanently, and cut out or punch out and completely remove notches or punch holes for the month and the date of the kill. One part of the tag shall be immediately attached to the ear of the bear and kept attached during the open season and for 15 days thereafter. The holder of the bear tag shall immediately, upon harvesting a bear, notify the department in a manner specified by the commission. Except as otherwise provided by this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code, it is unlawful to possess any untagged bear.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 98.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4754.

(a) Any person who is convicted of a violation of any provision of this code, or of any rule, regulation, or order made or adopted under this code, relating to bears shall forfeit his or her bear tags, and new bear tags shall not be issued to that person during the then current license year for hunting licenses.

(b) A person described in subdivision (a) shall not apply for bear tags for the following license year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4755.

Any person legally killing a bear in this state shall have the tag for that bear countersigned by a commissioner, a person employed in the department, a person designated for that purpose by the commission, a notary public, a postmaster, a peace officer, or by an officer authorized to administer oaths, before transporting the bear, except to transport the bear to the nearest person authorized by this section to countersign the tag on the route from where the bear is taken to that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 99.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4757.

Any person taking a bear must retain possession of the skin of the bear and the portion of the bear’s head that includes both ears, during the open season for that bear and for 15 days thereafter, and must produce the skin and that portion of the head upon the demand of any officer authorized to enforce the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 100.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4758.

(a) Subject to the provisions of this code permitting the sale of domestically raised game mammals, it is unlawful to sell or purchase, or possess for sale, the meat, skin, hide, teeth, claws, or other parts of any bear in this state.

(b) The possession of more than one bear gall bladder is prima facie evidence that the bear gall bladders are possessed for sale.

(c) Nothing in this section prohibits a sale authorized pursuant to Section 3087.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 556, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4759.

The skin, hide, teeth, claws, or other parts of any bear lawfully taken and possessed for the period provided in Section 4757 may be tanned or utilized for personal use only. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 4757, the skin, hide, teeth, claws, or other parts of any bear lawfully taken may be donated any time to veterans’ organizations or veterans’ service committees for use by veterans for rehabilitation purposes. The donor shall obtain a receipt which shall be retained during the period stipulated by Section 4757.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1208.)
-------------------------------------------

4760.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the possession of bear apply to bear taken outside this State and transported into this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1916.)
-------------------------------------------

4763.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the taking of bear which is otherwise authorized to protect livestock, land, or property from damage or threatened damage from bear.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1916.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Mountain Lions [4800. - 4810.]

4800.

(a) The mountain lion (genus Puma) is a specially protected mammal under the laws of this state.

(b) (1) It is unlawful to take, injure, possess, transport, import, or sell a mountain lion or a product of a mountain lion, except as specifically provided in this chapter or in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2116) of Division 3.

(2) This chapter does not prohibit the sale or possession of a mountain lion or a product of a mountain lion, when the owner can demonstrate that the mountain lion, or product of a mountain lion, was in the person’s possession on June 6, 1990.

(3) This chapter does not prohibit the possession of a mountain lion carcass or a product of a mountain lion carcass, if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The carcass or carcass product is prepared or being prepared for display, exhibition, or storage, for a bona fide scientific or educational purpose, at a nonprofit museum or government-owned facility generally open to the public or at an educational institution, including a public or private postsecondary institution.

(B) The mountain lion was taken in California consistent with the requirements of this chapter and any other applicable law.

(C) The department has authorized the possession of the carcass or carcass product for the purposes of this paragraph.

(c) A violation of
 this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. An individual is not guilty of a violation of this section if it is demonstrated that, in taking or injuring a mountain lion, the individual was acting in self-defense or in defense of others.

(d) Section 219 does not apply to this chapter. Neither the commission nor the department shall adopt any regulation that conflicts with or supersedes a provision of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 75.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section was added on June 5, 1990, by initiative Prop. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

4801.

The department may remove or take any mountain lion, or authorize an appropriate local agency with public safety responsibility to remove or take any mountain lion, that is perceived to be an imminent threat to public health or safety or that is perceived by the department to be an imminent threat to the survival of any threatened, endangered, candidate, or fully protected sheep species.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 435, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1999.   Note: This section was added on June 5, 1990, by initiative Prop. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

4801.5.

(a) Unless authorized in this chapter, nonlethal procedures shall be used when removing or taking any mountain lion that has not been designated as an imminent threat to public health or safety.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “imminent threat to public health or safety” means a situation where a mountain lion
 exhibits one or more aggressive behaviors directed toward a person that is not reasonably believed to be due to the presence of responders.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “nonlethal procedures” means procedures that may include, but are not limited to, capturing, pursuing, anesthetizing, temporarily possessing, temporarily injuring, marking, attaching to or surgically implanting monitoring or recognition devices, providing veterinary care, transporting, hazing, rehabilitating, releasing, or taking no action.

(d) The department may, as the department determines is necessary to protect mountain lions or the public, authorize qualified individuals, educational institutions, governmental agencies, or nongovernmental organizations to implement nonlethal procedures on a mountain lion in accordance with subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 208, Sec. 1.   (SB 132)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4802.

Any person, or the employee or agent of a person, whose livestock or other property is being or has been injured, damaged, or destroyed by a mountain lion may report that fact to the department and request a permit to take the mountain lion.

(History: Repealed and added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 117.)
-------------------------------------------

4803.

Upon receipt of a report pursuant to Section 4802, the department, or any animal damage control officer specifically authorized by the department to carry out this responsibility, shall immediately take the action necessary to confirm that there has been depredation by a mountain lion as reported. The confirmation process shall be completed as quickly as possible, but in no event more than 48 hours after receiving the report. If satisfied that there has been depredation by a mountain lion as reported, the department shall promptly issue a permit to take the depredating mountain lion.

(History: Repealed and added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 117.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.

In order to ensure that only the depredating mountain lion will be taken, the department shall issue the permit pursuant to Section 4803 with the following conditions attached:

(a) The permit shall expire 10 days after issuance.

(b) The permit shall authorize the holder to begin pursuit not more than one mile from the depredation site.

(c) The permit shall limit the pursuit of the depredating mountain lion to within a 10-mile radius from the location of the reported damage or destruction.

(History: Repealed and added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 117.)
-------------------------------------------

4805.

Whenever immediate authorization will materially assist in the pursuit of the particular mountain lion believed to be responsible for the depredation reported pursuant to Section 4802, the department or the animal damage control officer may orally authorize the pursuit and taking of the depredating mountain lion, and the department shall issue a written permit for the period previously authorized as soon as practicable after the oral authorization.

(History: Repealed and added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 117.)
-------------------------------------------

4806.

Any person issued a permit pursuant to Section 4803 or 4805 shall report, by telephone within 24 hours, the capturing, injuring, or killing of any mountain lion to an office of the department or, if telephoning is not practicable, in writing within five days after the capturing, injuring, or killing of the mountain lion. At the time of making the report of the capturing, injuring, or killing, the holder of the permit shall make arrangements to turn over the mountain lion or the entire carcass of the mountain lion which has been recovered to a representative of the department and shall do so in a timely manner.

(History: Repealed and added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 117.)
-------------------------------------------

4807.

(a) Any mountain lion that is encountered while in the act of pursuing, inflicting injury to, or killing livestock, or domestic animals, may be taken immediately by the owner of the property or the owner’s employee or agent. The taking shall be reported within 72 hours to the department. The department shall investigate the depredation, and, if the mountain lion was captured, injured, or killed, the mountain lion or the entire carcass of the mountain lion which has been recovered shall be turned over to the department. Upon satisfactorily completing the investigation and receiving the mountain lion or the carcass, if recovered, the department shall issue a permit confirming that the requirements of this section have been met with respect to the particular mountain lion taken under these circumstances.

(b) The department shall undertake a complete necropsy on any returned mountain lion carcass and report the findings to the commission. The commission shall compile the reported findings and prepare an annual written report that shall be submitted to the Legislature not later than the January 15 next following the year in which the mountain lion was taken.

(History: Repealed and added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 117.)
-------------------------------------------

4808.

As used in this chapter, “agent” means the agent or employee of the owner of the damaged or destroyed property, any county or city predator control officer, any employee of the Animal Damage Control Section of the United States Department of Agriculture, any departmental personnel, or any authorized or permitted houndsman registered with the department as possessing the requisite experience and having no prior conviction of any provision of this code or regulation adopted pursuant to this code. A plea of nolo contendere is a conviction for purposes of this section.

(History: Repealed and added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 117.)
-------------------------------------------

4809.

Mountain lions authorized to be taken pursuant to this chapter shall be taken by the most effective means available to take the mountain lion causing the damage or destruction, except that no mountain lion shall be taken by means of poison, leg-hold or metal-jawed traps, and snares.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 117.)
-------------------------------------------

4810.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Authorized research project” means a research project involving mountain lions subject to a Scientific Collecting Permit issued in accordance with this section.

(2) “Permitholder” means a person to whom the department has issued a Scientific Collecting Permit in accordance with this section.

(3) “Scientific Collecting Permit” or “permit” means a permit issued pursuant to Section 1002 for a research project involving mountain lions in accordance with this section.

(b) The department may authorize
 qualified individuals, educational institutions, governmental agencies, or nongovernmental organizations to conduct scientific research involving mountain lions pursuant to a Scientific Collecting Permit as provided in Section 1002.

(c) The department may authorize a permitholder to pursue, capture, temporarily possess, temporarily injure, mark, surgically implant a monitoring or recognition device in or attach such a device to, provide veterinary care to, and transport, a mountain lion or a product of a mountain lion.

(d) In addition to the requirements in Section 1002, an authorized research project shall be designed to do the following:

(1) Contribute to the knowledge of natural wildlife ecosystems.

(2) Minimize disruptions in the lives and movements
 of mountain lions and other wildlife, as well as impacts to mountain lion or other wildlife habitat, while maintaining the permitholder’s research objectives.

(3) Directly or indirectly support the sustainability and survival of mountain lion populations and healthy ecosystems.

(4) Prevent the permanent injury or killing of a mountain lion.

(e) An authorized research project shall be governed by the Scientific Collecting Permit. The permit shall include, at a minimum, proposed research methods and recordkeeping procedures that address the following:

(1) The capture of, anesthetization of, collection of diagnostic samples from, and transport of, a mountain lion or a product of a mountain lion.

(2) Attaching monitoring or recognization devices to, surgically implanting those devices in, or marking, animals affected by the research project.

(3) Providing veterinary care as required for the health, safety, and humane treatment of animals affected by the research project.

(4) The recording of the adverse effects of authorized research procedures on mountain lions and other wildlife.

(5) The qualifications of onsite personnel necessary for carrying out authorized research procedures. A permit applicant shall submit verifiable documentation demonstrating that at least one onsite staff person has at least one year of experience in proposed research methods that involve activities described in subdivision (c).

(6) Annual and final
 reports to the department.

(f) The department shall notify the public at least 30 days prior to the issuance of a permit, and, upon request, shall make available to the public copies of the permit and annual and final reports.

(g) The department shall handle mortality or permanent injury to a mountain lion as a result of research authorized pursuant to this section in a manner consistent with the reporting and processing requirements imposed in Section 4807.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 76.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Bighorn Sheep [4900. - 4903.]

4900.

The Legislature declares that bighorn sheep are an important wildlife resource of the state to be managed and maintained at sound biological levels. Therefore, it is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to encourage the preservation, restoration, utilization, and management of California’s bighorn sheep population. The management shall be in accordance with the policy set forth in Section 1801.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 745, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4901.

The department shall determine the status and the trend of bighorn sheep populations by management units. A plan shall be developed for each of the management units. The plan for each management unit shall include all of the following:

(a) Data on the numbers, age, sex ratios, and distribution of bighorn sheep within the management unit.

(b) A survey of range conditions and a report on the competition that may exist as a result of human, livestock, wild burro, or any other mammal encroachment. 

(c) An assessment of the need to relocate or reestablish bighorn populations. 

(d) A statement on the prevalence of disease or parasites within the population.

(e) Recommendations for achieving the policy objective of Section 4900.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 745, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4902.

(a) The commission may adopt all regulations necessary to provide for biologically sound management of Nelson bighorn sheep (subspecies Ovis canadensis nelsoni).

(b) (1) After the plans developed by the department pursuant to Section 4901 for the management units have been submitted, the commission may authorize sport hunting of mature Nelson bighorn rams. Before authorizing the sport hunting, the commission shall take into account the Nelson bighorn sheep population statewide, including the population in the management units designated for hunting.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 219, the commission shall not, however, adopt regulations authorizing the sport hunting in a single year of more than 15 percent of the mature Nelson bighorn rams in a single management unit, based on the department’s annual estimate of the population in each management unit.

(c) The fee for a bighorn ram tag to take a Nelson bighorn ram shall be four hundred dollars ($400) for a resident of the state, which shall be adjusted annually pursuant to Section 713. On or before July 1, 2015, the commission shall, by regulation, fix the fee for a nonresident of the state at not less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), which shall be adjusted annually pursuant to Section 713. Fee revenues shall be deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section 3953 and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended as set
 forth in that section.

(d) The commission shall annually direct the department to authorize not more than three of the tags available for issuance that year to take Nelson bighorn rams for the purpose of raising funds for programs and projects to benefit Nelson bighorn sheep. These tags may be sold to residents or nonresidents of the State of California at auction or by another method and shall not be subject to the fee limitation prescribed in subdivision (c). Commencing with tags sold for the 1993 hunting season, if more than one tag is authorized, the department shall designate a nonprofit organization organized pursuant to the laws of this state, or the California chapter of a nonprofit organization organized pursuant to the laws of another state, as the seller of not less than one of these tags. The number of tags authorized for the purpose of raising funds pursuant to this
 subdivision, if more than one, shall not exceed 15 percent of the total number of tags authorized pursuant to subdivision (b). All revenue from the sale of tags pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section 3953 and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended as set forth in that section.

(e) No tag issued pursuant to this section shall be valid unless and until the licensee has successfully completed a prehunt hunter familiarization and orientation and has demonstrated to the department that he or she is familiar with the requisite equipment for participating in the hunting of Nelson bighorn rams, as determined by the commission. The orientation shall be conducted by the department at convenient locations and times preceding each season, as determined by the commission. 

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 295, Sec. 11.   (AB 2151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.

Revenue from the fees authorized by this chapter shall be deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section 3953 and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended as set forth in that section. Administrative overhead shall be limited to the reasonable costs associated with the direct administration of the program. These funds shall be used to augment, and not to replace, moneys appropriated from existing funds available to the department for the preservation, restoration, utilization, and management of bighorn sheep. The department shall maintain internal accountability necessary to ensure that all restrictions on the expenditure of these funds are met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 408, Sec. 14.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. PROTECTED REPTILES AND AMPHIBIANS [5000. - 5062.]



CHAPTER 1. Turtles [5000. - 5002.]



  ARTICLE 1. Desert Tortoises [5000. - 5002.]

5000.

It is unlawful to sell, purchase, harm, take, possess, transport, or shoot a projectile at, a tortoise (Gopherus). This section does not apply to the taking of a tortoise when authorized by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 77.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.

The provisions of Section 5000 do not prohibit the possession of any tortoise (Gopherus) when the owner can demonstrate that such tortoise was legally acquired and possessed before the effective date of this section. The owner of a tortoise which may be possessed under this section shall mark or otherwise identify such tortoise to the satisfaction of the department, and shall not transfer such tortoise to any other person without prior approval of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.

The department may issue permits, subject to any terms and conditions prescribed by the commission, authorizing the possession of a tortoise (Gopherus) or product of a tortoise by an educational or scientific institution or a public zoological garden.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 78.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Fully Protected Reptiles and Amphibians [5050. - 5050.]

5050.

(a) (1) Except as provided in this section, or Section 2081.5, 2081.7, 2081.9, 2081.12, 2081.15, or 2835, a fully protected reptile or amphibian may not be taken or possessed at any time. No provision of this code or any other law shall be construed to authorize the issuance of a permit or license to take a fully protected reptile or amphibian, and no permit or license previously issued shall have any force or effect for that purpose. However, the department may authorize the taking of a fully protected reptile or amphibian for necessary scientific research, including efforts to recover fully protected, threatened, or endangered species. Before authorizing the take of a fully protected reptile or
 amphibian, the department shall make an effort to notify all affected and interested parties to solicit information and comments on the proposed authorization. The notification shall be published in the California Regulatory Notice Register and be made available to each person who has notified the department, in writing, of that person’s interest in fully protected species and who has provided an email address, if available, or postal address to the department. Affected and interested parties shall have 30 days after notification is published in the California Regulatory Notice Register to provide relevant information and comments on the proposed authorization.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “scientific research” does not include an action taken as part of specified mitigation for a project, as defined in Section 21065 of the Public Resources Code.

(3) A legally imported fully
 protected reptile or amphibian may be possessed under a permit issued by the department.

(b) The following are fully protected reptiles and amphibians:

(1) Blunt-nosed leopard lizard (Gambelia sila).

(2) San Francisco garter snake (Thamnophis sirtalis tetrataenia).

(3) Santa Cruz long-toed salamander (Ambystoma macrodactylum croceum).

(4) Limestone salamander (Hydromantes brunus).

(5) Black toad (Bufo boreas exsul).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 59, Sec. 5.   (SB 147)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Commercial Use of Reptiles [5060. - 5062.]

5060.

“Native reptiles” as used in this chapter means snakes, lizards, turtles, or any other members of the class reptilia native to California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 605.)
-------------------------------------------

5061.

The commission shall establish rules and regulations for the commercial take, sale, transport, export, or import of native reptiles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 605.)
-------------------------------------------

5062.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no permit shall be issued for the operation of a farm for alligators or any species of the family crocodilidae if the animals are kept for the use and sale of the meat or hides. No permit for the operation of a farm for alligators or any species of the family crocodilidae shall be renewed if the animals are kept for the use and sale of the meat or hides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 776, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. FISH [5500. - 9101.]



PART 1. GENERALLY [5500. - 6951.]



  CHAPTER 1. Miscellaneous [5500. - 5523.]

5500.

It is unlawful to use explosives in the waters of the state inhabited by fish, except in one of the following circumstances:

(a) Pursuant to a permit first obtained by the user from the department, consistent with terms and conditions set by the commission. The department’s decision to grant or deny a permit may be appealed to the commission by any person.

(b) In an emergency, to remove an accidental obstruction to the flow of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 101.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5501.

The department may take any fish which, in its opinion, is unduly preying upon any bird, mammal, or fish. The commission may prescribe the terms of a permit to take any fish which, in the opinion of the department, is harmful to other species of fish and which should be reduced in numbers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5503.

It is unlawful to take any fish for the sole purpose of removing its eggs except for the purpose of developing a brood stock for aquaculture purposes under Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000) pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Fish and Game Commission.

The commission shall also determine ownership and regulate distribution of progeny taken from wild brood stock, other than those obtained pursuant to Section 15300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

5504.

The department may issue a letter of authorization to allow the taking of marine living resources or to authorize the take and possession of marine resources and possession of gear or equipment that would otherwise be prohibited in marine waters to support data collection, environmental cleanup, hazard removal, or public health and safety. A letter of authorization shall be valid for no more than 30 days, shall not be extended, and shall be issued only to meet immediate time-sensitive public safety, public health, research, or environmental needs, and shall not authorize the taking of fully protected species listed in Section 3511, 4700, 5050, or 5515, or species listed as threatened or endangered pursuant to Section 2070. A letter of authorization is not
 a substitute for a permit issued under Section 1002, Section 1022, or any other law and regulation that can otherwise be obtained. A letter of authorization shall identify the issuee and include detailed information about the activity authorized. The department shall maintain records of all letters of authorization for no less than five years from the date of issuance, and shall provide them upon request to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 770, Sec. 1.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5505.

Mollusks, crustaceans, and amphibia may be used for bait or released in the same waters wherein taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

5507.
